tables/da-dk-g28.ctb
# characters that have letsign as part of their definition
# (to be removed when the alwaysletsign opcode has been implemented).
punctuation * 6-35 ASTERISK
uppercase Q 6-123457 LATIN CAPITAL LETTER Q
uppercase W 6-24567 LATIN CAPITAL LETTER W
uppercase X 6-13467 LATIN CAPITAL LETTER X
uppercase Z 6-13567 LATIN CAPITAL LETTER Z
punctuation \\ 6-347 REVERSE SLASH
lowercase q 6-12345 LATIN SMALL LETTER Q
lowercase w 6-2456 LATIN SMALL LETTER W
lowercase x 6-1346 LATIN SMALL LETTER X
lowercase z 6-1356 LATIN SMALL LETTER Z
punctuation \x2026 6-3-3-3 #Elipsis (0x85)
noback punctuation \x0085 6-3-3-3 #Elipsis (0x85)
uplow \x017d\x017e 6-3467,6-346 #LATIN  LETTER Z WITH CARON (0x8e)
noback uplow \x008e\x009e 6-3467,6-346 #LATIN  LETTER Z WITH CARON (0x8e)
letter \x2013 6-36 #EN DASH (0x96)
noback sign \x0096 6-36 #EN DASH (0x96)
letter \x2014 6-367 #Em DASH (0x97)
noback sign \x0097 6-367 #Em DASH (0x97)
punctuation \x00a4 6-2367 CURRENCY SIGN (0xa4)
punctuation \x00a8 6-56 DIAERESIS (0xa8)
punctuation \x00ac 6-34567 NOT SIGN (0xac)
sign \x00b0 4-356 DEGREE SIGN (0xb0)
sign \x00b5 6-236 MICRO SIGN
punctuation \x00be 6-3456 VULGAR FRACTION THREE QUARTERS
punctuation \x00bf 6-34 INVERTED QUESTION MARK
uplow \x00c0\x00e0 6-123567,6-12356 LATIN  LETTER A WITH GRAVE
uplow \x00c7\x00e7 6-123467,6-12346 LATIN  LETTER C WITH CEDILLA
uplow \x00c8\x00e8 6-23467,6-2346 LATIN  LETTER E WITH GRAVE
uplow \x00c9\x00e9 6-1234567,6-123456 LATIN  LETTER E WITH ACUTE
uplow \x00ca\x00ea 6-1267,6-126 LATIN  LETTER E WITH CIRCUMFLEX
uplow \x00cb\x00eb 6-12467,6-1246 LATIN  LETTER E WITH DIAERESIS
uplow \x00ce\x00ee 6-1467,6-146 LATIN  LETTER I WITH CIRCUMFLEX
uplow \x00cf\x00ef 6-124567,6-12456 LATIN  LETTER I WITH DIAERESIS
uplow \x00d4\x00f4 6-14567,6-1456 LATIN  LETTER O WITH CIRCUMFLEX
uplow \x00d9\x00f9 6-234567,6-23456 LATIN  LETTER U WITH GRAVE
uplow \x00db\x00fb 6-1567,6-156 LATIN  LETTER U WITH CIRCUMFLEX
uplow \x00dc\x00fc 6-12567,6-1256 LATIN  LETTER U WITH DIAERESIS

# Misc letters from other character sets prefixed with dot 5
# to be implemented

### misc opcodes ###

# Emphasis opcodes
# Emphasis opcodes
emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold

begemphphrase italic 56
endemphphrase italic after 56
begemphword italic 56
endemphword italic 56

begemphphrase bold 56
endemphphrase bold after 56
begemphword bold 56
endemphword bold 56

begemphphrase underline 56
endemphphrase underline after 56
begemphword underline 56
endemphword underline 56

# special symbols
decpoint , 2
hyphen - 368
letsign 6
noletsign IQWXZiqwxz
noletsignbefore 1234567890
sign \xffff df

# Special characters that always need letsigns because they represent contractions
always \x00a1 6-256 # inverted exclamationmark

#Special sequences, urls emails and file names.
nocont $
nocont \\
nocont @
nocont ://
nocont www
nocont .com
nocont .dk
nocont .eu
nocont .edu
nocont .gov
nocont .mil
nocont .net
nocont .org
nocont .uk
nocont .doc
nocont .exe
nocont .htm
nocont .tex
nocont .txt
nocont .gif
nocont .jpg
nocont .png
nocont .wav
nocont .tar
nocont .zip

#Words
word af 356
word aldrig 1-35
word aig =
word alle 1-15
begnum ae 6-1-15
contraction ae
word allerede 1-123-1235
begnum alr 6-1-123-1235
contraction alr
word alligevel 1-123-1236
begnum alv 6-1-123-1236
contraction alv
word altid 1-2345-145
begnum atd 6-1-2345-145
contraction atd
word altså 1-16
begnum aå 6-1-16
contraction aå
word at 1

word blevet 12-2345
begnum bt 6-12-2345
contraction bt
word blev 12-1236
begnum bv 6-12-1236
contraction bv
word blive 12-3456
word bve 12-1236-15
word bliver 12

word derefter 23456-1356
word derst =
word deres 256
word derfor 23456-124
word derf =
word derigennem 23456-24-12456
word derige 1456-1235-24-12456
word dermed 23456-134
word derm =
word derned 23456-1246
word derne =
word derop 23456-135
word dero =
word derover 23456-1346
word deror =
word derpå 23456-1234
word derp =
word dersom 23456-234
word ders =
word dertil 23456-2345
word dert =
word derunder 23456-12345
word derved 23456-1236
word din 145-1345
begnum dn 6-145-1345
contraction dn
word disse 145-234
begnum ds 6-145-234
contraction ds
word dit 145-2345
begnum dt 6-145-2345
contraction dt
word du 145

word efter 1356
word eller 15
word endnu 15-136
begnum eu 6-15-136
contraction eu

word fik 124-13
begnum fk 6-124-13
contraction fk
word fordi 124-145
begnum fd 6-124-145
contraction fd
word forskellige 124-123456-15
word fske =
word forskelligt 124-123456-2345
word fskt =
word forskellig 124-123456
word fsk =
word for 124
word fra 235
word første 124-1356-15
word først 124-1356
word før 246

word ganske 1245-123456
word gennem 12456
word ge =
word gik 1245-13
begnum gk 6-1245-13
contraction gk
word gør 1245

word ham 236
word hans 13456-234
begnum ys 6-13456-234
contraction ys
word han 13456
word har 125
word havde 125-1456
word hde =
word have 125-3456
word hve =
word helt 125-2345
begnum ht 6-125-2345
contraction ht
word hendes 125-234
begnum hs 6-125-234
contraction hs
word hende 125-145
begnum hd 6-125-145
contraction hd
word hun 136
word hvad 2456
word hv =
word hvis 2456-234
word hvs =
word hvordan 34-1
word hvora 34-6-1
word hvorefter 34-1356
word hvorst 34-234-2345
word hvorfor 34-124
word hvorf 34-6-124
word hvorigennem 34-24-12456
word hvorledes 34-15
word hvore 34-6-15
word hvormed 34-134
word hvorm 34-6-134
word hvornår 34-1345
word hvorn 34-6-1345
word hvorover 34-1346
word hvoror 34-135-1235
word hvorpå 34-1234
word hvorp 34-6-1234
word hvortil 34-2345
word hvort 34-6-2345
word hvorunder 34-12345
word hvornd 34-1345-145
word hvorved 34-1236
word hvorv 34-6-1236
word hvor 34

word igennem 24-12456
word ige =
word igen 35
word ig =
word ikke 24-13
begnum ik 6-24-13
contraction ik
word imidlertid 24-24
begnum ii 6-24-24
contraction ii

word jeg 245

word kan 13
word kommer 13-156
word ker =
word kommet 13-346
word ket =
word komme 13-146
word kme =
word kom 13-134
begnum km 6-13-134
contraction km
word kunne 13-1246
word kne =

word ligesom 123-234
begnum ls 6-123-234
contraction ls
word lige 123
word lille 123-123
begnum ll 6-123-123
contraction ll

word mange 134-12456
word mge =
word med 134
word megen 146-126
word meen =
word meget 146-346
word meet =
word mellem 146-134
word mem =
word men 146
word me =
word min 134-1345
begnum mn 6-134-1345
contraction mn
word mit 134-2345
begnum mt 6-145-2345
contraction mt
word måske 134-123456
word msk =
word måtte 134-1256
word mte =

word naturligvis 1345-2345-1236
begnum ntv 6-1345-2345-1236
contraction ntv
word nd =
word ned 1246
word ne =
word nogen 1345-1345
begnum nn 6-1345-1345
contraction nn
word noget 1345-2345
begnum nt 6-1345-2345
contraction nt
word nogle 1345-123-15
begnum nle 6-1345-123-15
contraction nle
word når 1345

word også 14-16
begnum cå 6-14-16
contraction cå
word og 14
word omkring 135-134-13
begnum omk 6-135-134-13
contraction omk
word op 135
word or =
word over 1346

word på 1234

word ret 12356
word re 1235-15
word rigtige 1235-12456
word rge =
word rigtigt 1235-2345
begnum rt 6-1235-2345
contraction rt
word rigtig 1235

word sagde 234-1456
word sammen 234-134
begnum sm 6-234-134
contraction sm
word samme 234-146
word sme =
word selvfølgelig 234-1236-124
begnum svf 6-234-1236-124
contraction svf
word selv 234-1236
begnum sv 6-234-1236
contraction sv
word sidste 234-1356-15
word sste =
word sidst 234-1356
word sst =
word sin 234-1345
begnum sn 6-234-1345
contraction sn
word sit 234-2345
begnum st 6-234-2345
contraction st
word skal 123456
word sk =
word skulle 123456-123-15
word skle =
word snart 234-1235
begnum sr 6-234-1235
contraction sr
word som 234
word sådan 16-1
begnum åa 6-16-1
contraction åa
word således 16-15
begnum åe 6-16-15
contraction åe
word så 16

word tid 2345-145
begnum td 6-2345-145
contraction td
word tilbage 2345-12
begnum tb 6-2345-12
contraction tb
word til 2345

word under 12345

word var- =
word var. =
word var 36
word ved 1236
word ville 1236-123-15
begnum vle 6-1236-123-15
contraction vle
word vil 1236-123
begnum vl 6-1236-123
contraction vl
word været 1236-2345
begnum vt 6-1236-2345
contraction vt
word være 345

#Words (capital version)
word Af 3567
word Aldrig 17-35
word Aig =
word Alle 17-15
begnum Ae 6-17-15
contraction Ae
word Allerede 17-123-1235
begnum Alr 6-17-123-1235
contraction Alr
word Alligevel 17-123-1236
begnum Alv 6-17-123-1236
contraction Alv
word Altid 17-2345-145
begnum Atd 6-17-2345-145
contraction Atd
word Altså 17-16
begnum Aå 6-17-16
contraction Aå
word At 17

word Blevet 127-2345
begnum Bt 6-127-2345
contraction Bt
word Blev 127-1236
begnum Bv 6-127-1236
contraction Bv
word Blive 127-3456
word Bve 127-1236-15
word Bliver 127

word Derefter 234567-1356
word Derst =
word Deres 2567
word Derfor 234567-124
word Derf =
word Derigennem 234567-24-12456
word Derige 14567-1235-24-12456
word Dermed 234567-134
word Derm =
word Derned 234567-1246
word Derne =
word Derop 234567-135
word Dero =
word Derover 234567-1346
word Deror =
word Derpå 234567-1234
word Derp =
word Dersom 234567-234
word Ders =
word Dertil 234567-2345
word Dert =
word Derunder 234567-12345
word Derved 234567-1236
word Din 1457-1345
begnum Dn 6-1457-1345
contraction Dn
word Disse 1457-234
begnum Ds 6-1457-234
contraction Ds
word Dit 1457-2345
begnum Dt 6-1457-2345
contraction Dt
word Du 1457

word Efter 13567
word Eller 157
word Endnu 157-136
begnum Eu 6-157-136
contraction Eu

word Fik 1247-13
begnum Fk 6-1247-13
contraction Fk
word Fordi 1247-145
begnum Fd 6-1247-145
contraction Fd
word Forskellige 1247-123456-15
word Fske =
word Forskelligt 1247-123456-2345
word Fskt =
word Forskellig 1247-123456
word Fsk =
word For 1247
word Fra 2357
word Første 1247-1356-15
word Først 1247-1356
word Før 2467

word Ganske 12457-123456
word Gennem 124567
word Ge =
word Gik 12457-13
begnum Gk 6-12457-13
contraction Gk
word Gør 12457

word Ham 2367
word Hans 134567-234
begnum Ys 6-134567-234
contraction Ys
word Han 134567
word Har 1257
word Havde 1257-1456
word Hde =
word Have 1257-3456
word Hve =
word Helt 1257-2345
begnum Ht 6-1257-2345
contraction Ht
word Hendes 1257-234
begnum Hs 6-1257-234
contraction Hs
word Hende 1257-145
begnum Hd 6-1257-145
contraction Hd
word Hun 1367
word Hvad 24567
word Hv =
word Hvis 24567-234
word Hvs =
word Hvordan 347-1
word Hvora 347-6-1
word Hvorefter 347-1356
word Hvorst 347-234-2345
word Hvorfor 347-124
word Hvorf 347-6-124
word Hvorigennem 347-24-12456
word Hvorige 347-24-1245-15
word Hvorledes 347-15
word Hvore 347-6-15
word Hvormed 347-134
word Hvorm 347-6-134
word Hvornår 347-1345
word hvorn 347-6-1345
word Hvorover 347-1346
word Hvoror 347-135-1235
word Hvorpå 347-1234
word Hvorp 347-6-1234
word Hvortil 347-2345
word Hvort 347-6-2345
word Hvorunder 347-12345
word Hvornd 347-1345-145
word Hvorved 347-1236
word Hvorv 347-6-1236
word Hvor 347

word Igennem 247-12456
word Ige =
word Igen 357
word Ig =
word Ikke 247-13
begnum Ik 6-247-13
contraction Ik
word Imidlertid 247-24
begnum Ii 6-247-24
contraction Ii

word Jeg 2457

word Kan 137
word Kommer 137-156
word Ker =
word Kommet 137-346
word Ket =
word Komme 137-146
word Kme =
word Kom 137-134
begnum Km 6-137-134
contraction Km
word Kunne 137-1246
word Kne =

word Ligesom 1237-234
begnum Ls 6-1237-234
contraction Ls
word Lige 1237
word Lille 1237-123
begnum Ll 6-1237-123
contraction Ll

word Mange 1347-12456
word Mge =
word Med 1347
word Megen 1467-126
word Meen =
word Meget 1467-346
word Meet =
word Mellem 1467-134
word Mem =
word Men 1467
word Me =
word Min 1347-1345
begnum Mn 6-1347-1345
contraction Mn
word Mit 1347-2345
begnum Mt 6-1457-2345
contraction Mt
word Måske 1347-123456
word Msk =
word Måtte 1347-1256
word Mte =

word Naturligvis 13457-2345-1236
begnum Ntv 6-13457-2345-1236
contraction Ntv
word Nd =
word Ned 12467
word Ne =
word Nogen 13457-1345
begnum Nn 6-13457-1345
contraction Nn
word Noget 13457-2345
begnum Nt 6-13457-2345
contraction Nt
word Nogle 13457-123-15
begnum Nle 6-13457-123-15
contraction Nle
word Når 13457
